Maryland, session 2025, SB0445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
5–205.
(a) The Administration shall be the central coordinating and directing agency of
all public assistance programs in the State, including:
(1) the Family Investment Program and related cash benefit programs;
(2) public assistance to adults;
(3) emergency assistance;
(4) food stamps;
(5) medical assistance eligibility determinations;
(6) the Energy Assistance Program;
(7) the Temporary Disability Assistance Program; [and]
– 1 –

Ch. 371 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(8) THE FEDERAL COMMODITY SUPPLEMENTAL FOOD PROGRAM
WITH FUNDS AND RESOURCES RECEIVED FROM THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT
OF AGRICULTURE UNDER 7 C.F.R. 247; AND
[(8)] (9) any other public assistance activities financed wholly or partly
by the Administration.
10–204.
(a) The Secretary shall administer[:
(1)] the programs and activities that the federal government delegates to
the State under the Older Americans Act of 1965 that are not otherwise committed by law
to another unit of State government[; and
(2) the federal Commodity Supplemental Food Program with funds and
resources received from the United States Department of Agriculture under 7 C.F.R. 247].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –